Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 4 POWERSPORTS VEHICLES
44-20-432. Right of action for loss.

A person has a right of action against the licensed powersports vehicle dealer, used powersports vehicle dealer, or the dealer's powersports salespersons if the person suffers loss or damage by reason of fraud practiced on the person by a dealer or one of the dealer's salespersons acting on the dealer's behalf or within the scope of the employment or suffers loss or damage by reason of the violation by the dealer or salesperson of any provision of this part 4 related to fraud that is designated by the board by rule, whether or not the violation is the basis for denial, suspension, or revocation of a license. The right of a person to recover for loss or damage as provided in this subsection (1) against the dealer or salesperson is not limited to the amount of their respective bonds.

If a person suffers any loss or damage by reason of any unlawful act under section 44-20-423 (1)(a), the person shall have a right of action against the powersports vehicle manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative. In a court action wherein a powersports vehicle manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative has been found liable in damages to any person under this part 4, the amount of damages so determined shall be trebled and shall be recoverable by the person so damaged. Any person so damaged shall also be entitled to recover reasonable attorney fees.

If a licensee suffers loss or damage by reason of an unlawful act under section 44-20-423 (1), the licensee shall have a right of action against the powersports vehicle manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative. In a court action wherein a powersports vehicle manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative has been found liable in damages to a licensee under this part 4, the licensee so damaged shall also be entitled to recover reasonable attorney fees.

A person who suffers loss or damages resulting from fraud may bring a separate action against, and recover from the surety on the bond of, the licensed powersports vehicle dealer, used powersports vehicle dealer, or powersports salesperson if:

The licensed dealer or salesperson has not reimbursed the person for the loss or damages; and

After either:

The board issued a final agency order with a finding of fraud by a licensed dealer or salesperson; or

A court entered judgment upon a claim of fraud by a licensed dealer or salesperson.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 132, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(1) amended and (4) added, (SB 20-140), ch. 225, p. 1106, § 7, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-530 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-433. Contract disputes - venue - choice of law.

In the event of a dispute between a powersports vehicle dealer and a powersports vehicle manufacturer under a franchise agreement, notwithstanding any provision of the agreement to the contrary:

At the option of the powersports vehicle dealer, venue shall be proper in the county or judicial district where the dealer resides or has its principal place of business; and

Colorado law shall govern, both substantively and procedurally.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 133, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-531 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-434. Advertisement - inclusion of dealer name.

No powersports vehicle dealer or used powersports vehicle dealer or an agent of a dealer shall advertise an offer for the sale, lease, or purchase of a powersports vehicle that creates the false impression that the vehicle is being offered by a private party or that does not contain the name of the dealer or the word "dealer" or, if the name is contained in the offer and does not clearly reflect that the business is a dealer, both the name of the dealer and the word "dealer".

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 133, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-532 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-435. Payout exemption to execution.

A powersports vehicle dealer's right to receive payments from a manufacturer or distributor required by section 44-20-423 (1)(l) and (1)(r) is not liable to attachment or execution and may not otherwise be seized, taken, appropriated, or applied in a legal or equitable process or by operation of law to pay the debts or liabilities of the manufacturer or distributor. This section shall not prohibit a secured creditor from exercising rights accrued pursuant to a security agreement if the right arose as a result of the manufacturer or distributor voluntarily creating a security interest before paying existing debts or liabilities of the manufacturer or distributor. This section shall not prohibit a manufacturer or distributor from withholding a portion of the payments necessary to cover an amount of money owed to the manufacturer or distributor as an offset to the payments if the manufacturer or distributor provides the motor vehicle dealer written notice thereof.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 133, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-534 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-436. Site control extinguishes.

If a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative has terminated, eliminated, or not renewed a franchise agreement containing a site control provision, the powersports vehicle dealer may void a site control provision of a franchise agreement by returning any money the dealer has accepted in exchange for site control prorated by the time remaining before the agreement expires over the time period between the agreement being signed and the agreement expiring. This section does not apply if the termination, elimination, or nonrenewal is for just cause in accordance with section 44-20-423 (1)(d).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 133, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-535 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-437. Modification voidable.

If a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative fails to comply with section 44-20-423 (1)(v)(II), the powersports dealer may void the modification or replacement of the franchise agreement.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 134, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-536 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-438. Termination appeal.

A powersports vehicle dealer who has reason to believe that a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative has violated section 44-20-423 (1)(d) or (1)(v) may appeal to the board by filing a complaint with:

The executive director; or

A district court if neither the executive director nor the administrative law judge, appointed in accordance with this section, holds a hearing concerning the complaint within sixty days after the complaint was filed.

Upon filing a verified complaint alleging with specific facts that a violation has occurred under this section, the termination, elimination, modification, or nonrenewal of the franchise agreement is automatically stayed, without the motor vehicle dealer posting a bond, until a final determination is made on each issue raised in the complaint; except that the executive director, administrative law judge, or court may cancel the stay upon finding that the cancellation, termination, or nonrenewal of the franchise agreement was for any of the reasons specified in section 44-20-423 (1)(d)(III). The automatic stay maintains all rights under the franchise agreement until the final determination of the issues raised in the verified complaint. The manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative shall not name a replacement motor vehicle dealer for the market or location until a final order is entered.

If a verified complaint is filed with the executive director, the executive director shall refer the complaint to an administrative law judge with the office of administrative courts for final agency action.

In resolving a termination complaint, the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative has the burden of proving any claim made that the factors listed in section 44-20-423 (1)(d)(II) apply to the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal.

The prevailing party in a claim that a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal violates section 44-20-423 (1)(d) or (1)(v) is entitled to recover attorney fees and costs, including expert witness fees, incurred in the termination protest.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 134, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-537 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-439. Stop-sale directives - used powersports vehicles - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Average trade-in value" means the value of a used powersports vehicle as established by a generally accepted, published, third-party used vehicle resource.

"Stop-sale directive" means an unconditional directive from a manufacturer or distributor to a powersports vehicle dealer to stop selling a type of powersports vehicle manufactured by the manufacturer or distributed by the distributor because of a safety defect.

The manufacturer or distributor shall reimburse a powersports vehicle dealer in accordance with subsection (3) of this section if:

The manufacturer or distributor issues a stop-sale directive for a powersports vehicle manufactured or distributed by the issuer of the stop-sale directive;

The powersports vehicle dealer holds an active sales, service, and parts agreement with the manufacturer or distributor for the line-make of the used powersports vehicle covered by the stop-sale directive;

The used powersports vehicle covered by the stop-sale directive is held in the inventory of the powersports vehicle dealer on the date the stop-sale directive is issued or taken by the dealer as a trade-in vehicle on a consumer purchase of the same line-make; and

The manufacturer or distributor has not provided a remedy procedure or made parts available to repair the used powersports vehicle for more than thirty days after the stop-sale directive was issued.

If the conditions in subsection (2) of this section are met, the manufacturer or distributor shall, upon application by the powersports vehicle dealer, pay or credit the dealer one and one-half percent per month of the average trade-in value of each used powersports vehicle's model affected by the stop-sale directive prorated from thirty days after the stop-sale directive was issued to the earlier of:

The date when the manufacturer or distributor provides the powersports vehicle dealer with a remedy procedure and any necessary parts for ordering to repair the used powersports vehicle; or

The date the powersports vehicle dealer transfers the powersports vehicle.

A manufacturer or distributor may determine the reasonable manner and method required for a powersports vehicle dealer to demonstrate the inventory status of a used powersports vehicle to determine eligibility for reimbursement.

This section applies only to used powersports vehicles.

This section is not intended to prevent a manufacturer or distributor from requiring that a powersports vehicle not be subject to an open recall or stop-sale directive as a condition for the powersports vehicle to be qualified or sold as a certified preowned vehicle or substantially similar designation.

This section does not require a manufacturer or distributor to provide total compensation to a powersports vehicle dealer that would exceed the total average trade-in valuation of the affected used powersports vehicle.

This section does not preclude a powersports vehicle dealer and a manufacturer or distributor from agreeing to reimbursement terms that differ from those specified in this section.

Compensation provided to a powersports vehicle dealer under this section is exclusive and may not be combined with any other remedy under state or federal law.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 134, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-538 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-439.5. Fulfillment and compensation for warranty and recall obligations - definitions.

As used in this section:

"Manufacturer" means a powersports vehicle manufacturer, a powersports vehicle distributor, and a powersports vehicle manufacturer representative.

"Nonwarranty repair" means a diagnosis, repair, labor, or part for which payment was made by a person other than a manufacturer and that was not a warranty obligation. "Nonwarranty repair" also means customer-pay repairs, labor, or parts.

"Part" means an accessory, a part, or a component used to repair a powersports vehicle. "Part" includes engine and transmission parts and all powersports vehicle assemblies.

"Repair" means diagnosing, work, and labor performed by a powersports vehicle dealer for which the powersports vehicle dealer is making a claim for compensation.

"Retail labor rate" means the rate for labor calculated by the powersports vehicle dealer in accordance with subsection (4) of this section that a manufacturer is required to pay a powersports vehicle dealer in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

"Retail parts markup percentage" means the percentage markup on parts calculated by the powersports vehicle dealer in accordance with subsection (4) of this section that a manufacturer is required to pay a powersports vehicle dealer in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

"Warranty obligation" means diagnosing and repairing a powersports vehicle in accordance with any warranty, recall, or certified preowned warranty, under which a manufacturer makes a repair commitment to a consumer or powersports vehicle dealer.

At a powersports vehicle dealer's request, a manufacturer shall timely compensate the powersports vehicle dealer at the retail labor rate and the retail parts markup percentage in accordance with subsection (3) of this section for all labor performed and parts used by the powersports vehicle dealer for covered repairs performed in accordance with the warranty obligation, if the retail labor rate and retail parts markup percentage are reasonable and consistent with the requirements of this section that concern the retail labor rate and parts markup percentage.

A powersports vehicle dealer may establish the retail labor rate and the retail parts markup percentage by submitting to the manufacturer either of the following as decided by the powersports vehicle dealer:

One hundred sequential repair orders containing nonwarranty repairs, which may include a nonwarranty repair that is included in a repair order with a warranty obligation repair, that have been paid by a consumer and closed by the time of submission; or

All repair orders for nonwarranty repairs, which may include a nonwarranty repair that is included in a repair order with warranty obligation repair, that have been paid by a consumer and closed by the time of submission for a period of ninety consecutive days.

A manufacturer shall not disqualify a repair order under this subsection (3) because the repair order contains both warranty and nonwarranty repairs, but only nonwarranty repairs are used in the calculation of the retail labor rate and the retail parts markup percentage.

A powersports vehicle dealer may submit one set of repair orders for the purpose of calculating both its retail labor rate and the retail parts markup percentage or may submit separate sets of repair orders for purposes of calculating only its retail labor rate or for purposes of calculating only its retail parts markup percentage. If the rates from the calculation are ten percent higher or lower than the current rates, the manufacturer may request additional repair orders for the ninety days before or after the submitted repair orders for purposes of alteration.

Except with regard to a request for additional repair orders as provided in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the repair orders submitted under this subsection (3) to determine the retail labor rate must contain only repair orders from the last ninety days before the date the submission is sent to the manufacturer.

Except with regard to a request for additional repair orders as provided in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the repair orders submitted under this subsection (3) to determine the retail parts markup percentage must contain only repair orders from the last ninety days before the date the submission is sent to the manufacturer.

Except as provided in subsection (4)(c) of this section, to calculate the retail labor rate, the powersports vehicle dealer must divide the powersports vehicle dealer's total nonwarranty labor sales generated from the nonwarranty repairs submitted under subsection (3) of this section by the total number of labor hours that generated those total labor sales.

Except as provided in subsection (4)(c) of this section, to calculate the retail parts markup percentage, the powersports vehicle dealer must divide the powersports vehicle dealer's total parts sales generated from nonwarranty repairs submitted under subsection (3) of this section by the amount of the powersports vehicle dealer's total cost for those parts, subtracting one from this amount, and then multiplying the amount by one hundred.

The calculation of the retail labor rate in subsection (4)(a) of this section and of the retail parts markup percentage in subsection (4)(b) of this section do not include parts used or labor performed:

For manufacturer or powersports vehicle dealer special events, one-time specials, express service, and quoted-price promotional discounts, but this exclusion from the calculation does not include broadly applicable discounts offered by the dealer, such as percentage-off coupons, that apply to repairs and parts;

For parts sold at wholesale;

For routine maintenance, including replacement fluids, filters, batteries, bulbs, nuts, bolts, fasteners, tires, and belts;

That do not have individual part numbers;

For the repairs of a powersports vehicle owned by the powersports vehicle dealer, an affiliate of the powersports vehicle dealer, or an employee of either the powersports vehicle dealer or the affiliate;

For powersports vehicle dealer reconditioning;

For window tint, protective film, masking products, or window replacement labor;

For manufacturer-approved and -reimbursed goodwill repairs or replacements;

For emission inspections required by law;

For safety inspections required by law;

For which a volume discount was negotiated with a third-party payer, including government agencies, insurance carriers, and fleet operators, but not including third-party warranty companies or service contract companies.

Notwithstanding any manufacturer requirement, policy, procedure, guideline, or standard, a powersports vehicle dealer may submit to the manufacturer the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage as each is calculated in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.

A powersports vehicle dealer may request in writing, not more often than once annually, an increase in compensation for labor at the retail labor rate for warranty obligations.

A powersports vehicle dealer may request in writing, not more often than once annually, an increase in compensation for parts at the retail parts markup percentage for warranty obligations.

A manufacturer may conduct a periodic review of a powersports vehicle dealer's service records to verify the continuing accuracy of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage proposed by or in effect for the dealer.

A manufacturer shall not conduct a periodic review more than once per calendar year. This periodic review is not an audit in accordance with section 44-20-135.

If the submitted calculation of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage is materially inaccurate or is substantially different than the rate of or percentage of other similarly situated same line-make dealers within the state, a manufacturer may contest the powersports vehicle dealer's submitted calculations of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage by delivering a notice to the powersports vehicle dealer within forty-five days after receiving the submission in accordance with subsection (3) of this section from the powersports vehicle dealer. To comply with this subsection (6), the notice must:
(6) (a) (I) If the submitted calculation of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage is materially inaccurate or is substantially different than the rate of or percentage of other similarly situated same line-make dealers within the state, a manufacturer may contest the powersports vehicle dealer's submitted calculations of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage by delivering a notice to the powersports vehicle dealer within forty-five days after receiving the submission in accordance with subsection (3) of this section from the powersports vehicle dealer. To comply with this subsection (6), the notice must:

Include an explanation of the reasons that the manufacturer believes the calculation is subject to contest;

Provide evidence substantiating the manufacturer's position; and

Propose an adjustment of the contested retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage.

Upon the discovery of new relevant information by the manufacturer, the manufacturer may modify the grounds for contesting the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage after delivering the notice to the powersports vehicle dealer under this subsection (6), but the modification does not change the timing requirements in this section.

If the manufacturer does not timely contest the powersports vehicle dealer's calculation of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage in accordance with this subsection (6), the uncontested retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage becomes effective forty-five days after the manufacturer has received the submission from the powersports vehicle dealer, and thereafter, the manufacturer shall use the powersports vehicle dealer's increased retail labor rate and retail parts markup percentage in calculating compensation for warranty obligations until a subsequent calculation of the powersports vehicle dealer's retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage is established in accordance with this section.

If the manufacturer timely contests the powersports vehicle dealer's calculation of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage and the manufacturer and powersports vehicle dealer are unable to resolve the disagreement, the powersports vehicle dealer may seek a determination by filing a complaint with a court of competent jurisdiction or the executive director no later than sixty days after the new powersports vehicle dealer receives the manufacturer's challenge to the determined retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage.

In a court proceeding, the court shall determine, in accordance with this section, the proper retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage.

Any retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage established through the proceeding applies retroactively to calculate reimbursement for any labor and part beginning thirty days after the manufacturer received the submission required by subsection (3) of this section.

If the manufacturer contests the powersports vehicle dealer's calculation of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage, the manufacturer shall continue to reimburse the powersports vehicle dealer for warranty obligation repairs at the retail labor rate and retail parts markup percentage as both existed before the powersports vehicle dealer submitted a request for an increase under subsection (5) of this section. When the manufacturer and powersports vehicle dealer agree on the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage, the manufacturer shall pay any difference between the amount the manufacturer compensated the dealer and the amount agreed to by the powersports vehicle dealer and manufacturer as of thirty days after the manufacturer received the submission required by subsection (3) of this section.

In the court proceeding, the court shall award the prevailing party reasonable attorney fees and costs. If the powersports vehicle dealer prevails, the court shall award as damages the full amount of reimbursement that should have been paid to the powersports vehicle dealer.

When calculating the retail labor rate and the retail parts markup percentage, the manufacturer:

Shall not establish an unreasonable flat-rate time, nor establish unreasonable flat-rate labor times for new line-makes that are inconsistent with the existing rates;

Shall, if the manufacturer furnishes a part to a powersports vehicle dealer at no cost for use in performing a repair under a warranty obligation, compensate the powersports vehicle dealer for the authorized repair part by paying the dealer an amount equal to the retail parts markup percentage multiplied by the cost the dealer would have paid for the authorized part as listed in the manufacturer's price schedule;

Shall not establish a different part number for repairs made in accordance with a warranty obligation than the part number established for nonwarranty repairs solely to provide a lower compensation to a powersports vehicle dealer;

Shall not recover or attempt to recover, directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, any of its costs from the powersports vehicle dealer for compensating the powersports vehicle dealer under this section;

Shall not, directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, assess penalties or surcharges to the powersports vehicle dealer, limit allocation of powersports vehicles or parts to the powersports vehicle dealer, or take any adverse action based on the powersports vehicle dealer's exercise of the dealer's rights under this section;

Shall not require from a powersports vehicle dealer any information that is unduly burdensome or time consuming to obtain, including any part-by-part or transaction-by-transaction calculations.

Nothing in this section prohibits a manufacturer from increasing the price of a powersports vehicle or powersports vehicle part in the normal course of business.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-219), ch. 330, p. 1983, § 4, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section was numbered as § 12-6-538.5 in SB 18-219. That section was harmonized with SB 18-030 and relocated to this section.

44-20-440. Repeal of part.

This part 4 is repealed, effective September 1, 2027. Before its repeal, this part 4 is scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 136, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-539 as it existed prior to 2018.